New York, session 2025-2026, S1969.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 4 of section 859-a of the 2 general municipal law, as added by chapter 563 of the laws of 2015, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (f) the projected number of full time equivalent jobs that would be 5 retained and that would be created if the request for financial assist- 6 ance is granted, the projected timeframe for the creation of new jobs, 7 the estimated salary and fringe benefit averages or ranges for catego- 8 ries of the jobs that would be retained or created if the request for 9 financial assistance is granted, [and] an estimate of the number of 10 residents of the economic development region as established pursuant to 11 section two hundred thirty of the economic development law or the labor 12 market area as defined by the agency, in which the project is located 13 that would fill such jobs, and a statement acknowledging that jobs 14 filled by non-residents of New York state shall not be included when 15 assessing the progress toward achieving the objectives of the project. 16 The labor market area defined by the agency for this purpose may include 17 no more than six contiguous counties in the state, including the county 18 in which the project is to be located; 19 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 of section 859-a of the general 20 municipal law, as added by chapter 563 of the laws of 2015, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 (b) require each project owner, occupant or operator receiving finan- 23 cial benefits to provide annually a certified statement and documenta- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01500-01-5 S. 1969 2 1 tion: (i) enumerating the full time equivalent jobs retained and the 2 full time equivalent jobs created, for New York state residents, as a 3 result of the financial assistance, by category, including full time 4 equivalent independent contractors or employees of independent contrac- 5 tors that work at the project location, and (ii) indicating that the 6 salary and fringe benefit averages or ranges for categories of jobs 7 retained and jobs created that was provided in the application is still 8 accurate and if it is not still accurate, providing a revised list of 9 salary and fringe benefit averages or ranges for categories of jobs 10 retained and jobs created. For the purposes of this paragraph, posi- 11 tions filled by non-residents of New York state shall not be included in 12 the number of jobs retained or created. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 14 it shall have become a law.